Nevada, session 83, SB450.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 3.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.310 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection [,]
and subsection 2, the judge of each district court may appoint a
bailiff for the court in counties polling 4,500 or more votes. In
counties polling less than 4,500 votes, the judge may appoint a
bailiff with the concurrence of the sheriff.
2. Subject to the provisions of [subsections 2, 4 and 10,]
subsection 9, in a county whose population is 700,000 or more [, the
-
*SB450*

– 3 –
judge of each district court may appoint a deputy marshal for the
court instead of a bailiff. In each case, the] :
(a) A bailiff or deputy marshal [serves at the pleasure of the
judge he or she serves.
2.] may be assigned for the court; and
(b) Each bailiff or deputy marshal shall be deemed a local
government employee of the county.
3. In all judicial districts where there is more than one judge,
there may be a number of bailiffs or deputy marshals at least equal
to the number of judges, and in any judicial district where a circuit
judge has presided for more than 50 percent of the regular judicial
days of the prior calendar year, there may be one additional bailiff
or deputy marshal . [, each] Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 2, each additional bailiff or deputy marshal [to] must be
appointed by the joint action of the judges. [If]
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the
judges described in subsection 3 cannot agree upon the
[appointment] replacement of any bailiff or deputy marshal [within]
not more than 30 days after a vacancy occurs in the [office]
position of bailiff or deputy marshal, then the [appointment]
replacement must be made by a majority of the board of county
commissioners. In a county whose population is 700,000 or more,
not more than 30 days after a vacancy occurs in the position of
bailiff or deputy marshal, the replacement must be made by a
majority of the board of county commissioners.
[3.] 5. Each bailiff or deputy marshal shall:
(a) Preserve order in the court.
(b) Attend upon the prospective and seated members of the
jury.
(c) Open and close court.
[(d) Perform such other duties as may be required of him or her
by the judge of the court.
4. The bailiff or deputy marshal must be a qualified elector of
the county and shall give a bond, to be approved by the district
judge, in the sum of $2,000, conditioned for the faithful
performance of his or her duty.
5.] 6. The compensation of each bailiff or deputy marshal for
his or her services must be fixed by the board of county
commissioners of the county and his or her salary paid by the
county wherein he or she is appointed [,] or assigned, the same as
the salaries of other county officers or employees are paid.
[6.] 7. The board of county commissioners of the respective
counties shall allow the salary stated in subsection [5] 6 as other
salaries are allowed to county officers [,] or employees, and the
-
*SB450*

– 4 –
county auditor shall draw his or her warrant for it, and the county
treasurer shall pay it.
[7.] 8. The provisions of this section : [do not:]
(a) Authorize the bailiff or deputy marshal to serve any civil or
criminal process . [, except such orders of the court which are
specially directed by the court or the presiding judge thereof to him
or her for service.]
(b) [Except] Do not, except in a county whose population is
700,000 or more, relieve the sheriff of any duty required of him or
her by law to maintain order in the courtroom.
[8. If a deputy marshal is appointed for a court pursuant to
subsection 1, each session of the court must be attended by the
deputy marshal.]
9. [For good cause shown, a deputy marshal appointed for a
court pursuant to subsection 1 may be assigned temporarily to assist
other judicial departments or assist with court administration as
needed.
10.] A person [appointed] who is assigned to be a deputy
marshal for a court pursuant to subsection [1] 2 must be certified by
the Peace Officers’ Standards and Training Commission as a
category I peace officer not later than 18 months after
[appointment.] assignment.
Sec. 2. NRS 4.353 is hereby amended to read as follows:
4.353 1. Subject to the provisions of subsections 2 [, 4] and
[10,] 8, in a county whose population is 700,000 or more, [the
justice of the peace for each justice court may appoint] a deputy
marshal [for the court] :
(a) May be assigned instead of a bailiff [. The deputy marshal
serves at the pleasure of the justice of the peace that the] ;
(b) Must be assigned from a pool of deputy [marshal serves.]
marshals; and
(c) Shall be deemed a local government employee of the
county.
2. In all townships where there is more than one justice of the
peace, there may be a number of deputy marshals at least equal to
the number of justices of the peace. [If the justices of the peace
cannot agree upon the appointment of any deputy marshal within]
Within 30 days after a vacancy occurs in the [office] position of
deputy marshal, the [appointment] replacement of the deputy
marshal must be made by a majority of the board of county
commissioners.
3. Each deputy marshal shall:
(a) Preserve order in the court.
(b) Open and close court.
-
*SB450*

– 5 –
(c) Attend upon the prospective and seated members of the
jury.
(d) Perform [other such duties as may be] any duty required [of
the deputy marshal] by [the justice of the peace of the court.] law.
4. [The deputy marshal must be a qualified elector of the
county and shall give bond, to be approved by the justice of the
peace, in the sum of $2,000, conditioned for the faithful
performance of his or her duty.
5.] The compensation of each deputy marshal for his or her
services must be fixed by the board of county commissioners of the
county and the deputy marshal’s salary paid by the county wherein
he or she is [appointed,] assigned, the same as the salaries of other
county [officers] employees are paid.
[6.] 5. The board of county commissioners of the respective
counties shall allow the salary stated in subsection [5] 4 as other
salaries are allowed to county [officers,] employees, and the county
auditor shall draw his or her warrant for it, and the county treasurer
shall pay it.
[7. The provisions of this section do not authorize the]
6. A deputy marshal [to] may serve any civil or criminal
process . [, except such orders of the court which are specially
directed by the court or the presiding justice of the peace thereof to
the deputy marshal for service.
8. If a]
7. A deputy marshal [is appointed for a court pursuant to
subsection 1,] must attend each session of the court [must be
attended by the deputy marshal.
9. For good cause shown, a deputy marshal appointed for a
court pursuant to subsection 1 may be assigned temporarily to assist
other justice courts or assist with court administration as needed.
10.] required by law.
8. A person [appointed] who is assigned to be a deputy
marshal pursuant to subsection 1 must be certified by the Peace
Officers’ Standards and Training Commission as a category I peace
officer not later than 18 months after [appointment.] assignment.
H
-
*SB450*